Mississippi, session 2026, SB3118.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  As used in this section: (a)  "Eligible expenses" means expenses paid by a parent or legal guardian of a dependent student, from a source other than Education Savings Account (ESA) funds, for: (i)  Tuition paid to an accredited private school; (ii)  Textbooks and instructional materials required for school or private instruction; (iii)  Required school supplies and materials; (iv)  Fees for school-sponsored activities; or (v)  Driver's education and similar fees paid through the school. (b) "Student" means a pupil in kindergarten through grade 12 in a public school, private school, or legitimate home instruction program. (2)  There shall be allowed as a credit against the taxes imposed by Section 27-7-5 an amount equal to a taxpayer's eligible expenses for each student.  The amount of the credit per student shall not exceed Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) in any calendar year. (3)  Any credit claimed under this section but not used in any tax year may be carried forward for five (5) consecutive years from the close of the tax year in which the credit was earned.  The credit that may be utilized in any tax year shall be limited to an amount not greater than the total state income tax liability of the taxpayer for that year. (4)   The aggregate amount of tax credits that may be awarded under this section in any calendar year shall not exceed Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00). (5)  A taxpayer shall apply for credits with the department on forms prescribed by the department.  In the application, the taxpayer shall itemize and provide documentation for the eligible expenses for each dependent student.  The department shall establish a lottery system for selecting taxpayers to be awarded the credit.  The selection shall be made according to taxpayer, not according to student, but the system shall be implemented so that the maximum aggregate amount of tax credits to be awarded in any calendar year shall not be exceeded.  The lottery shall be conducted in the calendar year after the eligible expenses were incurred, and the credit shall be awarded for the calendar year after the lottery. (6)  The department may promulgate regulations as needed to administer this section. (7)  This section creates a pilot program, and no credits shall be authorized under this section for eligible expenses incurred in any calendar year other than 2026. SECTION 2.  Section 1 of this act shall be codified in Article 1, Chapter 7, Title 27, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after January 1, 2026.